Utah statutes.
34A-1-404.   Injunction prohibited.
(1) An injunction may not be issued suspending or restraining:
(a)  any order by the commission or decision under this title; or
(b)  any action of the state auditor, state treasurer, attorney general, or
the auditor or treasurer of any county, required to be taken by them or any of
them by this title.
(2)  Notwithstanding Subsection (1), this section does not affect:
(a)  any right or defense in any action brought by the commission or the state
in pursuance of authority contained in this title; or
(b)  the right any party of interest has to appeal a decision or final order
of the commission.
